Wisconsin, session 2025, SB714.
do enact as follows:SB714,14Section 1. 302.072 of the statutes is created to read:SB714,2,35302.072 Bathing periods for inmates in state correctional institutions 6and county jails or houses of correction. (1) The department shall ensure 1that each inmate in a state correctional institution is provided with a minimum of 4 2bathing periods per week and that each bathing period includes at least 10 minutes 3of access to heated running water and 15 minutes of overall time.SB714,2,74(2) The sheriff shall ensure that each inmate in a county jail or house of 5correction is provided with a minimum of 4 bathing periods per week and that each 6bathing period includes at least 10 minutes of access to heated running water and 715 minutes of overall time.SB714,2,88